Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,170
Appeal.

Any appeal of an action taken at or as a result of a hearing held pursuant to section 77-27,169 shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 16.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.